Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-22] Benefits plan information and
enrollment. (a) The board shall make information summarizing approved
benefits plans available to each employee-beneficiary. The information shall,
to the extent reasonably possible, be distributed to each employee-beneficiary
at the same time and in the same manner.

(b) The board shall establish conditions and
procedures for benefits plan enrollment. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next